West Virginia, session 2026, HB4188.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2E. BIRTHING CENTERS. §16-2E-6. Creation of the tax credit for businesses who donate to birthing centers. (a) An eligible company may apply for, and the Tax Commissioner shall allow a nonrefundable tax credit equivalent to the amount of any donation to a birthing center or pregnancy center in this state. (b) In order for any eligible company to claim a tax credit under this section, the company must provide proof of the contribution to the birthing center or pregnancy center.(c) The Tax Commissioner shall be responsible for the implementation of this tax credit.